Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10 Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System
24-10-206. Federal taxation.

The Plan Administrator of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall operate the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and interpret § 24-10-101 et seq. consistent with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2011, and applicable United States Department of the Treasury Regulations, as they existed on January 1, 2011, necessary to allow the system to be operated as a “qualified trust” under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011.

Notwithstanding any language to the contrary under this chapter, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may promulgate rules consistent with this section.

Any rule or portion of a rule promulgated under this section that is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be in conflict with an applicable provision of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2011, shall be promptly corrected.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 3; 2017, No. 125, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2895.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “and regulations” in (b); and inserted “or regulation” twice in (c).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and deleted “or regulation” following “rule” twice in (c).

Subchapter 3
— Membership

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-10-301 and 24-10-302 may not apply to § 24-10-303 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1987, No. 357, § 7: Mar. 23, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the public health, welfare and safety that members in the public safety category of the Public Employees Retirement System should be permitted to transfer to another employment protecting the public health and safety and that current retirement laws discourage said transfers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1541, § 3: Apr. 12, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that certain municipal police departments have been members of the Public Employees' Retirement System for many years; that in 1981 the Local Police and Fire Retirement System was created especially for retirement benefits for municipal police and fire departments; that effective July 1, 1997, the Public Employees' Retirement System ended special credited service for police officers; that the rigors of police work need to be recognized as special by a specialized retirement system; and that it is now necessary to allow for the transfer of those departments to the Local Police and Fire Retirement where that special service can be recognized. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 803, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to attract and maintain good quality employees, the State of Arkansas should always have as its goal better benefits for its employees; that the employees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System would be better served by the retirement system for which they work; and that this act is immediately necessary to transfer the retirement benefits of the employees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System from the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2013, No. 522, § 5: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-10-301. Generally.

The membership of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall include the following persons:

If his or her employer had its firefighters covered by a relief fund on the operative date, each person first employed as a firefighter on or after the operative date shall become a member of this system and not be a member of the relief fund;

If his or her employer had its police officers covered by a relief fund on the operative date, each person first employed as a police officer on or after the operative date shall become a member of this system and not be a member of the relief fund;

If his or her employer did not have its firefighters covered by a relief fund on the operative date, all persons employed as firefighters on the date the employer covers firefighters under this subchapter shall become members of the system as of that date, and each person first employed as a firefighter thereafter shall become a member upon employment;

If his or her employer did not have its police officers covered by a relief fund on the operative date, all persons employed as police officers on the date the employer covers police officers under this subchapter shall become members of the system as of that date, and each person first employed as a police officer thereafter shall become a member upon employment;

The administrative staff of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System; and

A current active firefighter or police officer member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System employed as an instructor at the Arkansas Fire Training Academy or the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy on or after July 1, 2013.

In any case of question as to the system membership status of any person, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall decide the question.

When covering a person first employed in paid service as a firefighter or police officer on or after July 1, 1985, the employer shall require an employment physical examination of the employee, under criteria established by the board.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 3; 1985, No. 118, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3803; Acts 1987, No. 357, § 5; 1993, No. 1203, § 1; 1995, No. 642, § 1; 2007, No. 294, § 3; 2007, No. 803, § 3; 2013, No. 522, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2007, No. 803, § 1, provided: “Effective July 1, 2007, the retirement assets and accrued time of all Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System staff hired after January 1, 1999, shall be transferred from the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (a)(6).

24-10-302. Coverage by employer.

Each political subdivision without a relief fund in effect on the operative date may elect, by a majority vote of its governing body, to become an employer and cover its employees under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, as follows:

The clerk or secretary of the political subdivision shall certify, in a manner and form acceptable to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the determination of the political subdivision to the board within ten (10) days from and after the vote of the governing body.

The effective date of the political subdivision's coverage shall be the first day of the calendar month next following receipt by the board of the determination;

An employer may cover its employees who are police officers or its employees who are firefighters, or both groups.

Each political subdivision with a relief fund in effect on the operative date shall become an employer on the operative date and cover its employees under the system, as follows:

An employer with a relief fund covering police officers shall cover its future police officers; and

An employer with a relief fund covering firefighters shall cover its future firefighters.

After the effective date, a political subdivision shall not commence coverage of its employees who are police officers or firefighters under another plan similar in purpose to this system, except Social Security.

In the event an employer has in effect for all or part of its employees a plan similar in purpose to this system, then by agreement with the board, after the board has received the advice of its technical advisors concerning the agreement, that employer may provide for coverage under this system of either part or all of the employee's employment previously covered or coverable by the other plan, but only if the coverage and resulting benefits under this chapter do not duplicate any benefits previously provided by the other plan.

In providing for such coverage, an employer and the board shall pursue uniform policies and shall not discriminate in favor of or against any employee or group of employees.

Should an employer cover, under the system, its employees who are covered by a relief fund benefit program, the system coverage means the administration of the relief fund and shall not change the relief fund benefit program.

In the event an employee has service that is covered by, or is eligible to be covered by, or has resulted in benefit payments from, another retirement system which is supported by state funds or is authorized by the laws of the state, the coverage and benefits of the other retirement system shall not be forfeited or terminated because of other and separate service which is eligible for the system coverage, but only if the coverage under the other plan and the resulting benefits thereunder do not duplicate any benefits or service credit coverage provided by the system.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 3; 1983, No. 655, § 1; 1985, No. 490, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3803.

24-10-303. Rules governing participation.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall have the authority to promulgate such rules as are necessary to provide for the participation of employers that are rural fire protection corporations authorized under the provisions of § 4-34-101 et seq. However, the board shall not admit or retain any employer whose participation in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System would jeopardize the tax-qualified status of the plan under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., or that would subject the plan to additional federal requirements, or to any other consequence that the board would determine to be detrimental to the system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 865, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 2896.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in the text.

24-10-304. Transfer of municipal police department officers from Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Any municipal police department whose employees were covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on July 1, 1997, is authorized to transfer those employees hired after July 1, 1997, to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by:

Notifying the board of trustees of each of the retirement systems in writing, and accompanied by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality, of the intention to transfer the coverage of the qualifying officers; and

Authorizing the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to transfer any sums of money paid into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for the benefit of the officers of the particular department to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System for those officers transferred.

If any municipal police department elects to transfer retirement benefits under this section, all employees hired after July 1, 1997, must be enrolled in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not apply if the employees hired after July 1, 1997:

Are members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System at the time of hiring; and

Continue to receive public safety credit from prior and current employment.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1541, § 1; 2007, No. 290, § 1.

Subchapter 4
— Funds — Contributions — Management of Assets

Cross References.

Fire protection funding for planned community property owners association, § 24-11-811.

Local police and fire pension and relief funds, § 24-11-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 755, § 3: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that current law provides for distribution of insurance turnback for the support of individual fire and police pension and relief funds, and for fire fighters and police officers covered under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, but is unclear about the distribution of these moneys to political subdivisions in which all fire and/or police employees are covered under the statewide system, and that this Act is necessary to clarify the intent of existing law providing for the support of these retirement programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 152, § 7: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists regarding whether bank trust officers may serve as investment advisers to local police and fire pension funds; that it was never the intent that bank trust officers not be authorized to so act; that this Act clarifies the law to specifically authorize bank trust officers to serve as investment advisers to the local police and fire pension funds; and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to eliminate the confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1130, § 6: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to nonuniformed municipal employees pension and relief funds does not grant the board of trustees adequate latitude in the employment of an investment counselor and in investing the funds; that this act gives the boards of trustees of some such pension and relief funds the needed additional authority and should be given effect immediately to enable the boards of trustees of such funds to assure that such funds are as productive as possible. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 7: Apr. 23, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that premium tax distribution formula is directing state revenues to areas without the need for priority fire and police protection; that police and fire protection services are of extreme importance in the protection of property values and individual lives; that the distribution of premium tax revenues to the areas of the highest need is a top priority; that implementation of a revised distribution formula must be implemented before the normal time for the effectiveness of other laws; and that this act needs to be immediately effective to fulfill that priority. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 609, § 4: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the local police and fire pension and relief funds regarding retirement funding allocations require revision; and that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system. Therefore, an immediate emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 610, § 3: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System laws concerning the uniformed contribution rate for volunteer locations and the amount of prior service recognized for new volunteer departments need to be updated to meet the financial objectives of the system; that the sooner these changes are made, the sooner these locations and departments may reap the benefits of this act; and that this act is necessary because time is of the essence so the system may operate efficiently and equitably. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 720, § 6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that economic conditions have resulted in the need to increase retirement benefits; that it is sound public policy to increase the retirement benefit multiplier; and that the increase should be funded by an increase in the member's contribution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1316, § 3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that members under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are currently paying income tax on the employer's contribution to their retirement account; that other members of state-supported retirement systems are not required to pay income tax on their employer's contributions; and that the members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System should receive pre-tax employer contributions. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 556, § 6: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1065, § 15, as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 1: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 2: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1065 of 2013 was enacted with an erroneous emergency clause; that the error needs to be rectified as quickly as possible to effect the will of the General Assembly; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will correct and address the error found in the emergency clause of Act 1065 of 2013. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-10-401. Financial objectives and actuarial valuations.

The general financial objective of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and of each employer shall be to establish and receive contributions, expressed as percents of active employee pays, which will remain approximately level from year to year and which will not have to be increased for future generations of citizens.

More specifically, contributions received each year shall be sufficient both to fully cover the costs of benefit commitments being made to employees for their service being rendered in each year and to make a level payment which, if paid annually over a reasonable period of future years, will fully cover the unfunded costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall cause an actuarial valuation of each employer's participation to be made at least biennially, and preferably annually, to determine how well the system is meeting the objectives set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806.

24-10-402. Investments — Definition.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall be the trustee of the funds of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, subject to the other provisions of this subchapter.

The funds of the system shall be invested and reinvested, and the funds of local fire and police pension and relief funds, as created by §§ 14-52-106, 24-11-401 — 24-11-403, 24-11-405 — 24-11-413, 24-11-416, 24-11-417, 24-11-422, 24-11-423, 24-11-425, 24-11-428 — 24-11-430, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, with assets in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) may also be invested in accordance with the following procedure:

From time to time, the investment advisor under contract to the board shall formulate the policy to be followed in future investment activity, and he or she shall promptly furnish the policy to the board in writing each time he or she changes the policy.

“Investment advisor” means any person who for compensation engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or who for compensation issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning securities, and who is required to be registered as such with the State Securities Department. Furthermore, the term “investment advisor” includes officers of the bank trust departments even though the officers are not required to be registered with the State Securities Department;

The investment advisor shall have full power to purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the moneys or investments of the system pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter and in accordance with the current investment policy filed with the board;

At least semiannually, the investment advisor shall file with the board a written report setting forth, for the period since its last report, all investments purchased and sold, all receipts and disbursements, and any other transactions concerning system moneys;

At each regular meeting, the board shall examine each written report received from the investment advisor since the last regular meeting;

Anything in this section to the contrary notwithstanding, from time to time the board may direct a specific investment activity and shall be fully responsible for the direction;

Anything in this section to the contrary notwithstanding, investment activity shall be subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon state public employee retirement plans in the making and disposing of their investments;

Anything in this section to the contrary notwithstanding, until the assets of the system amount to at least five million dollars ($5,000,000), the funds of the system not in the checking account may be invested in shares of no-load mutual funds, each of which shall have the following characteristics:

The mutual fund shall be an open-end diversified investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as amended;

The management company of the investment company shall have been in operation for at least ten (10) years and shall have assets under management of more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000); and

There shall be no sales charge for purchasing shares of the fund and no redemption charge for selling the shares; and

The funds of local firemen's relief and pension funds and local policemen's pension and relief funds, with assets not in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), may be invested pursuant to the supervision and management of the board in the manner provided in this section. To the extent that such local funds are managed by the board, they may be commingled with other such funds which adopt the same investment objectives.

Except as to the rights of a member, retirant, or beneficiary, no trustee and no officer or employee of the board shall have any direct or indirect interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the board; nor shall any of them, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the assets of the system except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the board; nor shall any of them become an endorser or surety or become in any manner an obligor for moneys loaned by or borrowed from the board.

All assets of the system shall be held for the sole purpose of paying benefits and making disbursements in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and shall be used for no other purpose whatsoever.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the system shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; 1985, No. 6, § 1; 1985, No. 16, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 1987, No. 13, § 1; 1989, No. 152, § 2; 1995, No. 615, § 1; 2017, No. 795, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (d).

Cross References.

Investment of local pension and trust funds, § 24-9-201 et seq.

Public employee retirement plans generally, investments, § 24-2-201 et seq.

24-10-403. Asset accounts.

All the assets of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall be held in four (4) accounts, namely:

The members' deposit account;

The employer accumulation account;

The retirement reserve account; and

The income-expense account.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806.

24-10-404. Members' deposit account — Contributions.

The members' deposit account, as created by § 24-10-403, shall be the account in which shall be accumulated the contributions made by members to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and from which shall be made transfers and refunds of members' contributions as provided in this chapter.

If a member's covered employment is not also covered by Social Security, or if his or her covered employment is also covered by Social Security and his or her political subdivision has elected Benefit Program 2, as provided in § 24-10-602, and if he or she is receiving pays resulting in paid service credit, his or her contributions to the system shall be six percent (6%) of his or her pays.

Beginning July 1, 2009, the contribution for covered members defined in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of his or her pay.

Beginning July 1, 2009, the contribution for paid service members not defined in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be two and one-half percent (2.5%) of his or her pay.

The contributions shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum salary or wages provided by law for any member shall thereby be changed.

Each member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this section.

Payment of a member's pay less the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for services rendered by him or her to a political subdivision, except as to benefits provided by this system.

The officers responsible for making up the payrolls for each political subdivision shall cause the contributions provided for in this section to be deducted from the pay of each member in the employ of the political subdivision, on each and every payroll, to the date his or her membership terminates.

When deducted, each of the amounts shall be paid by the political subdivision to the system.

These payments shall be made in such manner and form, and in such frequency, and shall be accompanied by such supporting data, as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall prescribe from time to time.

When paid to the system, each of the amounts shall be credited to the member's individual account in the members' deposit account.

In addition to the contributions deducted from the pays of a member, as provided in this section, a member shall deposit into the members' deposit account by a single contribution or by an increased rate of contributions, as approved by the board, the amounts he or she may have withdrawn therefrom and not repaid thereto, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

In no case shall a member be given credit for service rendered before the date he or she withdrew his or her accumulated contributions until he or she returns to the members' deposit account all amounts due the account by him or her.

If an annuity becomes payable from the retirement reserve account to or on behalf of a member, his or her accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the retirement reserve account.

For purposes of deferring federal and state income tax under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 414(h)(2), as adopted by § 26-51-414, the political subdivision that pays the salary of the member shall pick up the member's contributions to the system as required by this section, beginning with contributions made on and after July 1, 2009.

Member contributions paid by the applicable political subdivision shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of salary to the member.

A deduction shall be made from each member's salary, equal to the amount of the member's contribution paid by the employer.

For all other purposes, member contributions paid by the political subdivision shall be considered member contributions.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 1995, No. 474, § 2; 2009, No. 720, § 1; 2009, No. 1316, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 720 inserted (b)(2) and redesignated the subsequent subdivisions accordingly.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1316 added (f).